District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
16 act may be cited as the “Archdiocese of Washington Parish Real Property, Deed Recordation, and
17 Transfer Tax Exemption Amendment Act of 2026”.
18 Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
19 follows:
20 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
21 follows:
22 “47-1099.16. Archdiocese of Washington Parish Real Property, Deed Recordation, and
23 Deed Transfer Tax Exemptions.”.
24 (b) A new section 47-1099.16 is added to read as follows:
1

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
25 “§ 47-1099.16 Archdiocese of Washington Parish Real Property, Deed Recordation, and
26 Deed Transfer Tax Exemptions.
27 “(a) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 159,
28 Lots 861 and 827, shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter
29 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
30 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Cathedral of St. Matthew the
31 Apostle Catholic Church, Inc.
32 “(b) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1800,
33 Lots 1, 20, and 802; and Square 1815, Lot 101, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter
34 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman
35 Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or
36 Annunciation Catholic Church, Inc.
37 “(c) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 3880,
38 Lots 1, 2, 13, 17, 18, 19, 800, 801, 802, 803, 804, and 805 shall be exempt from the tax imposed
39 by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the
40 Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St.
41 Anthony of Padua Catholic Church, Inc.
42 “(d) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 6005,
43 Lots 802 and 803 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
44 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
2

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
45 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Church of the Assumption of the Blessed
46 Virgin Mary Catholic Church, Inc.
47 “(e) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 4558,
48 Lot 33, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42
49 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
50 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Benedict the Moor Catholic Church, Inc.
51 “(f) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1862,
52 Lot 802; and Square 1863, Lots 47, 824, 825, and 826, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
53 Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the
54 Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or
55 Shrine of the Most Blessed Sacrament Catholic Church, Inc.
56 “(g) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1263,
57 Lot 163 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
58 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
59 successors in office, a corporation sole, or Epiphany Catholic Church, Inc.
60 “(h) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 4217,
61 Lot 802; and Square 4217N, Lot 808 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this
62 title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
63 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis de Sales
64 Catholic Church, Inc.
3

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
65 “(i) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 5550,
66 Lot 808; and Square 5552, Lot 832 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this
67 title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
68 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis Xavier
69 Catholic Church, Inc.
70 “(j) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 3224,
71 Lot 800 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
72 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
73 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Gabriel Catholic Church, Inc.
74 “(k) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1036,
75 Lots 114, 804, and 805; and Square 1071, Lot 805 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
76 Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the
77 Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or
78 Holy Comforter - St. Cyprian Catholic Church, Inc.
79 “(l) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 957,
80 Lot 814; and Square 4065, Lot 819 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this
81 title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
82 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Name of
83 Jesus Catholic Church, Inc.
4

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
84 “(m) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 557,
85 Lot 140 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
86 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
87 successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Redeemer Catholic Church, Inc.
88 “(n) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 566,
89 Lots 857, 859, 860, and 865, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
90 Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
91 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Rosary Catholic Church,
92 Inc.
93 “(o) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1227,
94 Lot 95 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42
95 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
96 successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Trinity Catholic Church, Inc.
97 “(p) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 423,
98 Lots 2, 801, and 802 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter
99 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
100 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Immaculate Conception Catholic
101 Church, Inc.
102 “(q) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 5204,
103 Lot 37 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42
5

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
104 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
105 successors in office, a corporation sole, or Church of the Incarnation Catholic Church, Inc.
106 “(r) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 756,
107 Lots 47, 52, 827, and 828 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
108 Chapter 11 of Title 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
109 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Joseph's on Capitol Hill
110 Catholic Church, Inc.
111 “(s) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 5330,
112 Lots 24 and 31 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
113 Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
114 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Luke Catholic Church, Inc.
115 “(t) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 3111,
116 Lot 806; and Square 3531, Lots 116 and 117 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9
117 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
118 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Martin of Tours
119 Catholic Church, Inc.
120 “(u) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 518,
121 Lots 911 and 912, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
122 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
6

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
123 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Mary, Mother of God, Catholic Church,
124 Inc.
125 “(v) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 2939,
126 Lots 802, 808, and 811 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
127 Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
128 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Nativity Catholic Church, Inc.
129 “(w) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
130 5817, Lot 803, and PAR-0226-0037 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this
131 title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
132 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady of
133 Perpetual Help Catholic Church, Inc.
134 “(x) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in PAR- 0198-
135 0065 and PAR-0199-0049 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
136 Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
137 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady Queen of Peace
138 Catholic Church, Inc.
139 “(y) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1374,
140 Lots 859 and 860 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
141 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
142 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady of Victory Catholic Church, Inc.
7

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
143 “(z) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 376,
144 Lots 820, 821, 822, and 827 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
145 Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
146 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Patrick Catholic Church, Inc.
147 “(aa) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 203
148 Lot 93; and Square 189 and Lot 45 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this
149 title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
150 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Augustine
151 Catholic Church, Inc.
152 “(bb) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 733,
153 Lot 50; and Square 793, Lot 25 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
154 and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
155 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Peter Catholic
156 Church, Inc.
157 “(cc) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
158 2675, Lot 826; and Square 2609, Lot 857, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of
159 this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
160 Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Shrine of the
161 Sacred Heart Catholic Church, Inc.
8

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
162 “(dd) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 27,
163 Lot 30 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42
164 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
165 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Stephen the Martyr Catholic Church, Inc.
166 “(ee) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
167 5773, Lot 835; Square 5605, Lot 110; and Square 5780, Lot 821, shall be exempt from the tax
168 imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned
169 by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation
170 sole, or St. Teresa of Avila Catholic Church, Inc.
171 “(ff) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
172 1739, Lot 57 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
173 Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
174 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Louis de France Catholic Church, Inc.
175 “(gg) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
176 2529, Lot 305 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
177 Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
178 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady Queen of the Americas Catholic
179 Church, Inc.
180 “(hh) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
181 1729, Lot 0007 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
9

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
182 Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
183 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Ann Catholic Church, Inc.
184 “(ii) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 2108,
185 Lot 806, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
186 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
187 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Thomas Apostle Catholic Church, Inc.
188 “(jj) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 6242,
189 Lot 834 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
190 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
191 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Thomas More Catholic Church, Inc.
192 “(kk) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 698,
193 Lot 818 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
194 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
195 successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Vincent de Paul Catholic Church, Inc.
196 “(ll) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 159,
197 Lot 860 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
198 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and
199 his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Cathedral of St. Matthew the Apostle Catholic
200 Church, Inc.
10

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
201 “(mm) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
202 1863, Lot 1 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
203 Title 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
204 and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Shrine of the Most Blessed Sacrament
205 Catholic Church, Inc.
206 “(nn) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
207 4217N, Lot 805 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
208 of Title 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
209 Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis de Sales Catholic
210 Church, Inc.
211 “(oo) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 376,
212 Lot 828 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
213 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and
214 his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Patrick Catholic Church, Inc.
215 “(pp) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 203,
216 Lot 806 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
217 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and
218 his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Augustine Catholic Church, Inc.
219 “(qq) The tax exemptions provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and not
220 in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Roman
11

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
221 Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, and the
222 respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in subsections (a) through (pp).
223 “(rr) The transfers of the properties listed in subsections (a) through (pp), for no
224 additional consideration, from the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors
225 in office, a corporation sole, as the record owner, to the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of
226 Washington as named in subsections (a) through (pp), the beneficial owners, shall be deemed to
227 be supplemental deed transfers, and any such supplemental deed transfers shall be exempt from
228 the taxes imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42, and shall not require the
229 submission of real property tax exemption applications.
230 “(ss) Each of the real properties listed in subsections (a) through (kk) shall remain exempt
231 from taxation imposed by Chapter 8 of this title under § 47-1002 so long as the property is
232 owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a
233 corporation sole, or the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in
234 subsections (a) through (kk), and provided that such owner, or any lessee, continues to use the
235 property as listed in subsections (a) through (kk) to provide religious, charitable, educational, or
236 related services, subject to any applicable provisions of § 47-1005 for any taxable portion of the
237 property. If any or all of the properties listed in subsections (a) through (kk) are transferred
238 through deemed supplemental deed transfers pursuant to subsection (rr), for no additional
239 consideration, from the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office,
240 a corporation sole, as the record owner, to the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of
12

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
241 Washington as named in subsections (a) through (kk), the beneficial owners, the properties in
242 question shall remain exempt from taxation under § 47-1002, subject to any applicable
243 provisions of § 47-1005 for any taxable portion of the property.
244 “(tt) Annually the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in
245 office, a corporation sole, or the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named
246 in subsections (a) through (kk), shall make the reports required by § 47-1007, as applicable, and
247 shall have the appeal rights provided by § 47-1009.”.
248 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
249 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
250 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
251 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
252 Sec. 4. Effective date.
253 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
254 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
255 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
256 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
257 Columbia Register.
13